dictsource/ja_rules
.group て
	て	te		// te
	てえ	te:		// tē
	てぇ	te:		// tē
	てー	te:		// tē
	で	de		// de
	でえ	de:		// dē
	でぇ	de:		// dē
	でー	de:		// dē
	てぃ	ti		// ti
	てぃー	ti:		// tī
	でぃ	di		// di
	でぃー	di:		// dī
	でゅ	d_ju		// dyu
	でゅー	d_ju:		// dyū
	てゅ	t_ju		// tyu
	てゅー	t_ju:		// tyū

.group と
	と	to		// to
	とお	to:		// tō
	とぉ	to:		// tō
	とー	to:		// tō
	ど	do		// do
	どお	do:		// dō
	どぉ	do:		// dō
	どー	do:		// dō
	とぅ	tu		// tu
	とぅー	tu:		// tū
	どぅ	du		// du
	どぅー	du:		// dū

.group な
	な	na		// na
	なあ	na:		// nā
	なぁ	na:		// nā
	なー	na:		// nā

.group に
	に	ni		// ni
	にい	ni:		// nī
	にぃ	ni:		// nī
	にー	ni:		// nī
	に (L21	n_j		// ny([auo]

.group ぬ
	ぬ	nu		// nu
	ぬう	nu:		// nū
	ぬぅ	nu:		// nū
	ぬー	nu:		// nū

.group ね
	ね	ne		// ne
	ねえ	ne:		// nē
	ねぇ	ne:		// nē
	ねー	ne:		// nē

.group の
	の	no		// no
	のお	no:		// nō
	のぉ	no:		// nō
	のー	no:		// nō

.group は
	は	ha		// ha
	はあ	ha:		// hā
	はぁ	ha:		// hā
	はー	ha:		// hā
	ば	ba		// ba
	ばあ	ba:		// bā
	ばぁ	ba:		// bā
	ばー	ba:		// bā
	ぱ	pa		// pa
	ぱあ	pa:		// pā
	ぱぁ	pa:		// pā
	ぱー	pa:		// pā

.group ひ
	ひ	Ci		// hi
	ひい	Ci:		// hī
	ひぃ	Ci:		// hī
	ひー	Ci:		// hī
	ひ (L21	C		// hy([auo]
	び	bi		// bi
	びい	bi:		// bī
	びぃ	bi:		// bī
	びー	bi:		// bī
	び (L21	b_j		// by([auo]
	ぴ	pi		// pi
	ぴい	pi:		// pī
	ぴぃ	pi:		// pī
	ぴー	pi:		// pī
	ぴ (L21	p_j		// py([auo]

.group ふ
	ふ	p\\u		// fu
	ふう	p\\u:	// fū
	ふぅ	p\\u:	// fū
	ふー	p\\u:	// fū
	ぶ	bu		// bu
	ぶう	bu:		// bū
	ぶぅ	bu:		// bū
	ぶー	bu:		// bū
	ぷ	pu		// pu
	ぷう	pu:		// pū
	ぷぅ	pu:		// pū
	ぷー	pu:		// pū
	ふぁ	p\\a		// fa
	ふぁー	p\\a:		// fā
	ふぃ	p\\i		// fi
	ふぃー	p\\i:		// fī
	ふぇ	p\\e		// fe
	ふぇー	p\\e:		// fē
	ふぉ	p\\o		// fo
	ふぉー	p\\o:		// fō

.group へ
	へ	he		// he
	へえ	he:		// hē
	へぇ	he:		// hē
	へー	he:		// hē
	べ	be		// be
	べえ	be:		// bē
	べぇ	be:		// bē
	べー	be:		// bē
	ぺ	pe		// pe
	ぺえ	pe:		// pē
	ぺぇ	pe:		// pē
	ぺー	pe:		// pē

.group ほ
	ほ	ho		// ho
	ほお	ho:		// hō
	ほぉ	ho:		// hō
	ほー	ho:		// hō
	ぼ	bo		// bo
	ぼお	bo:		// bō
	ぼぉ	bo:		// bō
	ぼー	bo:		// bō
	ぽ	po		// po
	ぽお	po:		// pō
	ぽぉ	po:		// pō
	ぽー	po:		// pō

.group ま
	ま	ma		// ma
	まあ	ma:		// mā
	まぁ	ma:		// mā
	まー	ma:		// mā

.group み
	み	mi		// mi
	みい	mi:		// mī
	みぃ	mi:		// mī
	みー	mi:		// mī
	み (L21	m_j		// my([auo]

.group む
	む	mu		// mu
	むう	mu:		// mū
	むぅ	mu:		// mū
	むー	mu:		// mū

.group め
	め	me		// me
	めえ	me:		// mē
	めぇ	me:		// mē
	めー	me:		// mē

.group も
	も	mo		// mo
	もお	mo:		// mō
	もぉ	mo:		// mō
	もー	mo:		// mō

.group や
	や	ja		// ya
	やあ	ja:		// yā
	やぁ	ja:		// yā
	やー	ja:		// yā

.group ゆ
	ゆ	ju		// yu
	ゆう	ju:		// yū
	ゆぅ	ju:		// yū
	ゆー	ju:		// yū

.group 𛀁
	𛀁	je		// ye (archaic)
	𛀁え	je:		// yē (archaic)
	𛀁ぇ	je:		// yē (archaic)
	𛀁ー	je:		// yē (archaic)

.group よ
	よ	jo		// yo
	よお	jo:		// yō
	よぉ	jo:		// yō
	よー	jo:		// yō

.group ら
	ら	r`a		// ra
	らあ	r`a:		// rā
	らぁ	r`a:		// rā
	らー	r`a:		// rā

.group り
	り	r`i		// ri
	りい	r`i:		// rī
	りぃ	r`i:		// rī
	りー	r`i:		// rī
	り (L21	r`_ja		// ry([auo]

.group る
	る	r`u		// ru
	るう	r`u:		// rū
	るぅ	r`u:		// rū
	るー	r`u:		// rū

.group れ
	れ	r`e		// re
	れえ	r`e:		// rē
	れぇ	r`e:		// rē
	れー	r`e:		// rē

.group ろ
	ろ	r`o		// ro
	ろお	r`o:		// rō
	ろぉ	r`o:		// rō
	ろー	r`o:		// rō

.group わ
	わ	wa		// wa
	わあ	wa:		// wā
	わぁ	wa:		// wā
	わー	wa:		// wā

.group ゐ
	ゐ	i		// wi (obsolete)
	ゐい	i:		// wī (obsolete)
	ゐぃ	i:		// wī (obsolete)
	ゐー	i:		// wī (obsolete)

.group ゑ
	ゑ	we		// we (obsolete)
	ゑえ	we:		// wē (obsolete)
	ゑぇ	we:		// wē (obsolete)
	ゑー	we:		// wē (obsolete)

.group を
	を	o		// wo
	をお	o:		// wō
	をぉ	o:		// wō
	をー	o:		// wō

.group ん
		ん		N\\	//    n
		ん	(L01	N	//    n (k
		ん	(L02	N	//    n (g
		ん	(L03	u~	//    n (s
	い)	ん	(L03	i~	// i) n (s
		ん	(L04	u~	//    n (sh
	い)	ん	(L04	i~	// i) n (sh
		ん	(L05	n	//    n (z
		ん	(L06	n	//    n (j
		ん	(L07	n	//    n (t
		ん	(L08	n	//    n (ch
		ん	(L09	n	//    n (ts
		ん	(L10	n	//    n (d
		ん	(L11	n	//    n (n
		ん	(L12	u~	//    n (h
	い)	ん	(L12	i~	// i) n (h
		ん	(L13	u~	//    n (f
	い)	ん	(L13	i~	// i) n (f
		ん	(L14	m	//    n (b
		ん	(L15	m	//    n (p
		ん	(L16	m	//    n (m
		ん	(L17	u~	//    n (y
	い)	ん	(L17	i~	// i) n (y
		ん	(L18	n	//    n (r
		ん	(L19	u~	//    n (w
	い)	ん	(L19	i~	// i) n (w
		ん	(L20	u~	//    n ([vowel]
	い)	ん	(L20	i~	// i) n ([vowel]

.group っ
	っ	(_	?
	っ	(L01	k	// k.k
	っ	(L02	g	// g.g
	っ	(L03	s	// s.s
	っ	(L04	s\\	// s.sh
	っ	(L05	z	// z.z
	っ	(L06	d	// d.j
	っ	(L07	t	// t.t
	っ	(L08	t	// t.ch
	っ	(L09	t	// t.ts
	っ	(L10	d	// d.d
	っ	(L11	n	// n.n
	っ	(L12	h	// h.h
	っ	(L13	p	// p.p
	っ	(L14	b	// b.b
	っ	(L15	p	// p.p
	っ	(L16	m	// m.m
	っ	(L18	r	// r.r
